Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-2425
Violation; unfair trade practice;
commission; powers.

Violation of any provision of sections
76-2401 to 76-2430 by a licensee shall constitute an unfair trade practice
pursuant to section 81-885.24 for which the commission may investigate and
take administrative action against the licensee pursuant to the Nebraska Real
Estate License Act.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 12.

Nebraska Real Estate License Act, see section 81-885.